public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
dexabitar/A
alastar/A
inalborar/A
realŧar/A
andar/A
ankorar/A
àrder/A
inarkar/A
arxarar/A
atergar/A
augurar/A
autoriđar/A
inaxolar/A
dexbafarar/A
baɉar/A
balar/A
balbetar/A
inbalordir/A
rabaltar/A
bandir/A
xbankar/A
xbaraɉar/A
inbarbaɉar/A
barkiđar/A
basilar/A
bàter/A
xbatimentar/A
inbaukir/A
xbefeɉar/A
xberlar/A
bevuŧar/A
xbigolar/A
inbirir/A
bixegolar/A
abokar/A
bolsegar/A
rebondolar/A
xborsar/A
dexboŧar/A
inbragesar/A
dexbratar/A
dexbriagar/A
dexbrojar/A
xbronkolar/A
xbudelar/A
inbusolar/A
buxinar/A
scauŧar/A
intracèñer/A
incepar/A
cokar/A
kontradir/A
defamar/A
detar/A
dixdisiar/A
indogar/A
redonar/A
dexdoronar/A
dubitar/A
đaliđar/A
konđónxer/A
èrđer/A
riensir/A
exalar/A
far/A
desfabrikar/A
faliar/A
desfantar/A
faturar/A
skarnifegar/A
feliŧitar/A
aferir/A
infervorar/A
infiamar/A
desfibrar/A
refikar/A
definir/A
fisar/A
infiubar/A
sfogonar/A
sfondar/A
informar/A
fornegar/A
afrankar/A
infraskar/A
rafredir/A
infrincar/A
fruar/A
fulmenar/A
fustegar/A
ingaɉar/A
inganar/A
garbar/A
xgarofolar/A
ingaxetar/A
gòder/A
xgorgar/A
xgrafiñar/A
xgranfar/A
ingraŧianir/A
xgremir/A
ingrintar/A
regroar/A
xgruñar/A
guarantir/A
dexgusar/A
imaxinar/A
ingaxar/A
inprexonar/A
intiriŧir/A
introitar/A
xɉanŧar/A
xɉinŧar/A
kabalar/A
kagar/A
skalivar/A
skaltrir/A
inkamufar/A
kandidar/A
kantar/A
inkapar/A
inkaponar/A
karenar/A
inkarolar/A
inkartonar/A
kastrar/A
kativar/A
kauxar/A
kavilar/A
klonar/A
kojonar/A
deskolar/A
rekoltar/A
inkomodar/A
konfuxionar/A
konpilar/A
deskontentar/A
konvoɉar/A
okórer/A
inkordar/A
skorniđar/A
deskostar/A
rekovèrđer/A
krepar/A
kritegar/A
krostolar/A
kuadriđar/A
intrakuerar/A
rekuixir/A
kuniar/A
inkurvar/A
xlanegar/A
lapaŧar/A
dexlatar/A
inledamar/A
leñar/A
xlevar/A
relievar/A
sotolinear/A
lokar/A
lontanar/A
xlubiar/A
xlúxer/A
magonar/A
xmaltir/A
manetar/A
stramañar/A
remarkar/A
inmarŧir/A
xmaskarar/A
maŧar/A
inmaxerir/A
melar/A
inmenestrar/A
remeritar/A
manométer/A
mietar/A
mirar/A
mòjer/A
molestar/A
remontar/A
amorbar/A
remorkiar/A
demostrar/A
mucarar/A
mular/A
mustagar/A
inmuxonar/A
naturaliđar/A
neniar/A
noar/A
denotar/A
inuvolir/A
obedir/A
inoɉar/A
adonbrar/A
operar/A
organar/A
osar/A
pacar/A
apagar/A
despaketar/A
paliđar/A
pancanar/A
paoniđar/A
inparar/A
inparentar/A
parteŧipar/A
inpaxetar/A
pasturar/A
inpaŧar/A
inpavionar/A
inpegolar/A
inpelumar/A
sospénder/A
despensar/A
peotar/A
spernacar/A
apetir/A
inpetolar/A
kontrapexar/A
traxpiantar/A
despiegar/A
pincar/A
piovexinar/A
spironar/A
piŧegar/A
konplikar/A
spolpar/A
apóner/A
rekonpóner/A
inpontar/A
pontiđar/A
portar/A
inposesar/A
ipotegar/A
strapregar/A
inprestar/A
dexinprimar/A
despropiar/A
punir/A
reputar/A
rabiar/A
dexraixar/A
rangar/A
rapar/A
raŧionar/A
rekamar/A
arénder/A
rexiduar/A
risar/A
roar/A
prorogar/A
romatiđar/A
ropegar/A
roversar/A
ruɉir/A
iruvidir/A
saganar/A
arsalar/A
saltar/A
sangonar/A
sartorar/A
scafeđar/A
insear/A
resekar/A
suseguir/A
konsejar/A
semenar/A
sentir/A
raseñar/A
servir/A
asetar/A
asiderar/A
simiotar/A
asíster/A
skalfurar/A
skaraventar/A
skatar/A
skinkar/A
skoređar/A
skriŧar/A
inskurir/A
arsolar/A
insolfarar/A
insoniar/A
insordir/A
sparar/A
spaŧiar/A
sperimentar/A
spianŧar/A
spiocar/A
spoɉar/A
spruŧar/A
sotostar/A
starnudir/A
statuir/A
stenografar/A
estirpar/A
destivar/A
instornir/A
stranuar/A
strikar/A
instruir/A
istuar/A
sturar/A
sufragar/A
sunar/A
sustar/A
tajar/A
takir/A
intanar/A
tapar/A
intardigar/A
tasteɉar/A
tàxer/A
desténder/A
tenkar/A
tenprar/A
teñir/A
trateñir/A
sostèñer/A
retéñer/A
terminar/A
pretestar/A
tirar/A
stironar/A
tolerar/A
tonkar/A
torkiar/A
tòrđer/A
tostar/A
sotràer/A
trajar/A
trapolar/A
tratiđar/A
trebiar/A
trexendar/A
trionfar/A
intronbonar/A
truskar/A
tutelar/A
ŧaponar/A
ŧelebrar/A
inŧerar/A
deŧervelar/A
deŧíder/A
ŧinganar/A
ŧitar/A
inŧopar/A
ukelar/A
uxar/A
evakuar/A
valutar/A
vanŧar/A
invaxar/A
vedovar/A
revelir/A
ventar/A
vénŧer/A
rinveñir/A
konvèñer/A
verđelar/A
vernar/A
inversiar/A
vestir/A
dexviar/A
invilanir/A
virar/A
vixilar/A
vogar/A
xvolaŧar/A
involtolar/A
vomitar/A
xàser/A
xbiegar/A
xelar/A
xermojar/A
xirandolar/A
xmincar/A
xovar/A
